Maryland, session 2025, SB0727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–811.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “DISPLACEMENT” MEANS THE PROVISION OF
STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES BY THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION THAT PRECLUDES A PRIVATE PERSON THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING THE
SERVICES AND IS LICENSED AND CERTIFIED TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES FROM
CONTINUING TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES.
(2) “DISPLACEMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE CIRCUMSTANCES IN
WHICH:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0727*

SENATE BILL 727
(I) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION DOES NOT
RENEW A CONTRACT FOR STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES, AND AT THE
END OF THE CONTRACT TERM, CONTRACTS WITH ANOTHER PERSON TO PROVIDE
THE SERVICES; OR
(II) THE PERSON THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING THE STUDENT
BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES:
1. HAS ACTED IN A MANNER THREATENING TO PUBLIC
HEALTH OR SAFETY;
2. HAS COMMITTED A MATERIAL BREACH OF A
CONTRACT FOR STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES; OR
3. REFUSES TO CONTINUE TO PROVIDE STUDENT BUS
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES UNDER THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF AN EXISTING
AGREEMENT.
(B) BEFORE TAKING ANY ACTION THAT RESULTS IN THE DISPLACEMENT OF
A PERSON THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES
IN CHARLES COUNTY, THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL:
(1) AT LEAST 10 YEARS BEFORE THE DISPLACEMENT, PROVIDE
NOTICE OF THE INTENT TO DISPLACE TO EACH PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE
SERVICES IN CHARLES COUNTY; AND
(2) (I) AT LEAST 5 YEARS BEFORE THE DISPLACEMENT, HOLD AT
LEAST ONE PUBLIC HEARING ON THE ADVISABILITY OF THE CHARLES COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION PROVIDING THE STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES;
AND
(II) PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE HEARING TO THE PUBLIC BY
PUBLISHING A NOTIFICATION IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE
COUNTY ONCE EACH WEEK FOR 2 SUCCESSIVE WEEKS BEFORE THE HEARING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.